Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Auditors and Audits

§ 1681.
Auditors; duties; meeting.

Town auditors shall meet at least 25 days before each annual town meeting to examine and adjust the accounts of all town officers and all other persons authorized by law to draw orders on the town treasurer.
(a) (1) Town auditors shall meet at least 25 days before each annual town meeting to examine and adjust the accounts of all town officers and all other persons authorized by law to draw orders on the town treasurer.

Such auditing shall include the account that the treasurer is required to keep with the collector, the tax accounts of the collector, trust accounts where the town or any town officer, as such officer, is trustee or where the town is sole beneficiary, accounts relating to the town indebtedness, and accounts of any special funds in the care of any town official.

Notice of such meeting shall be given by posting or publication ten days in advance of such meeting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 1682.
Report; distribution.

The auditors shall report their findings in writing and cause the same to be mailed or otherwise distributed to the voters of the town at least ten days before the annual meeting.
(a) (1) The auditors shall report their findings in writing and cause the same to be mailed or otherwise distributed to the voters of the town at least ten days before the annual meeting.

At a duly warned annual or special meeting, the voters of the town may vote to provide notice of the availability of the auditors’ report to the voters of the town in lieu of mailing or otherwise distributing the report itself. If the voters of the town vote to provide notice of availability, they must specify how notice of availability shall be given, and such notice of availability shall be provided to the voters of the town at least 30 days before the annual meeting.

Upon request, the auditors shall mail or distribute a copy of the full report to a voter or resident of the town.

When the auditors mail or distribute the report or provide notice of the availability of the report to the voters of the town, they shall at the same time deliver to the town clerk the copies required by section 1173 of this title and shall place all surplus copies in the custody of the town clerk before the first Tuesday in March.

As used in this subsection, the term “resident” shall be defined as the term is defined in

17 V.S.A. § 2122(b)

.

If a town has voted to eliminate the office of auditor, the findings of the public accountant employed in accordance with

17 V.S.A. § 2651b

shall be mailed or otherwise distributed by the selectboard in the same manner that findings are required to be distributed by auditors.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 119;

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2003, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2005;

2015, No. 30

, § 38, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 1683.
Contents of report; municipal fiscal years.

The report shall show a detailed statement of the financial condition of such town for its fiscal year, a classified summary of receipts and expenditures, a list of all outstanding orders and payables more than 30 days past due, and show deficit, if any, pursuant to section 1523 of this title and such other information as the municipality shall direct. Individuals who are exempt from penalty, fees, and interest by virtue of

32 V.S.A. § 4609

shall not be listed or identified in any such report, provided that they notify or cause to be notified in writing the municipal or district treasurer that they should not be so listed or identified.

The fiscal year of all school districts, charter provisions notwithstanding, shall end on June 30.

The fiscal year of other municipalities shall end on December 31, unless the municipality votes at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose to have a different fiscal year, in which case the fiscal year so voted shall remain in effect until amended.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 219

, § 2, eff. July 13, 1961;

1965, No. 23

, § 2;

1969, No. 301

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, subsec. (a), eff. July 1, 1971, subsec. (c), eff. April 9, 1970;

1971, No. 8

, § 1, eff. Feb. 25, 1971;

1989, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 110

, § 4, eff. June 28, 1991;

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. July 1, 2013;

2015, No. 30

, § 39, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 1684.
Trust assets; indebtedness.

The auditors shall make a detailed statement showing:

the condition of all trust funds in which the town is interested and a list of the assets of such funds, including the account of receipts and disbursements for the preceding year;

what bonds of the town are outstanding and the rate of interest and the amount thereof; and

what interest-bearing notes or orders of the town are outstanding and the serial number, date, amount, payee, and rate of interest of each and the total amount thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1685.
Subchapter application to villages.

Sections 1681-1684 of this subchapter shall apply to all incorporated villages.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 86.

§ 1686.
Penalty.

At any time in their discretion, town auditors may, and if requested by the selectboard, shall, examine and adjust the accounts of any town officer authorized by law to receive or disburse money belonging to the town.

If the town has voted to eliminate the office of auditor, the public accountant employed by the selectboard shall perform the duties of the town auditors under subsection (a) of this section upon request of the selectboard.

If, after at least five business days following his or her receipt by certified mail of a written request by the auditors or public accountant that is approved and signed by the legislative body, a town officer willfully refuses or neglects to submit his or her books, accounts, vouchers, or tax bills to the auditors or the public accountant, or to furnish all necessary information in relation thereto, that town officer shall be ineligible to reelection for the year ensuing and be subject to the penalties otherwise prescribed by law.
(c) (1) If, after at least five business days following his or her receipt by certified mail of a written request by the auditors or public accountant that is approved and signed by the legislative body, a town officer willfully refuses or neglects to submit his or her books, accounts, vouchers, or tax bills to the auditors or the public accountant, or to furnish all necessary information in relation thereto, that town officer shall be ineligible to reelection for the year ensuing and be subject to the penalties otherwise prescribed by law.

A town officer who violates subdivision (1) of this subsection (c) shall be personally liable to the town for a civil penalty in the amount of $100.00 per day until he or she submits or furnishes the requested materials or information. A town may bring an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court to enforce this subdivision.

As used in this section, the term “town officer” shall not include an officer subject to the provisions of

16 V.S.A. § 323

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. July 1, 2013;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2017, No. 27

, § 4, eff. May 10, 2017.

§ 1687.
Notice of orders.

A bank, trust company, or individual in this State holding orders or other evidences of indebtedness of a municipal corporation shall annually, on or before January 5, send written notice to the chair of the board of auditors of such corporation, stating the amount of such orders or other evidences of indebtedness and the balance due thereon as of December 31 next preceding, unless the holder of any such indebtedness is requested by such auditor to send such notice at some other date to conform to the fiscal year of such municipality.

§ 1688.
Notice of deposits.

A bank or trust company in this State having on deposit funds of a municipal corporation shall annually, on or before January 5, send written notice to the chair of the board of auditors of such corporation, stating the balance on deposit to the credit of such corporation on December 31 next preceding, unless the holder of such funds is requested by such auditor to send such notice at some other date to conform to the fiscal year of such municipality.

§ 1689.
Penalty for failure to send notice.

A bank, trust company, or individual who violates a provision of section 1687 or 1688 of this subchapter shall be fined not less than $10.00 nor more than $25.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 87.

§ 1690.
Certified or public accountant to audit town accounts; warning; form.

The legislative body of a city, town, or incorporated village may upon its own motion contract with a public accountant, licensed in this State, to perform an annual financial audit of all funds of the town; or upon petition in writing of legal voters equal to five percent of the legal voters of the town or village, the legislative body shall insert in the warning for any annual meeting, or in the warning for a special meeting, which shall be called upon such petition, an article in substantially the following form:

“To see if the [city, town, or village] will vote to instruct the [legislative body] to employ a certified public accountant or public accountant licensed in this State, to perform an annual financial audit of all funds of the [city, town, or village].”

Audits performed by a public accountant under this section shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, including the issuance of a report on internal control over financial reporting that shall be provided to recipients of the financial statements. When there are material weaknesses or significant deficiencies found in the internal control over financial reporting or the auditor’s or public accountant’s opinion is qualified, adverse, or disclaimed:

the auditor or public accountant shall present the findings or opinion to the legislative body of the town and explain those material weaknesses or significant deficiencies or his or her opinion at a meeting duly warned for the purpose;

after the audit report is delivered to the legislative body of a municipality, the notice for the next meeting of the legislative body shall also notify the voters of the availability of the audit report and the accompanying report on internal control over financial reporting;

the next published annual report of the town shall include a summary of material weaknesses or significant deficiencies found in the internal controls over financial reporting or a statement that the audit report sets forth an opinion that is qualified, adverse, or disclaimed; and

the legislative body shall post the audit report and the accompanying report on internal control over financial reporting on the municipality’s website, if the municipality has a website.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2009, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1691.
Terms of employment.

At an annual or special meeting warned as provided in section 1690 of this title, a town or incorporated village may authorize the employment of a certified public accountant or a public accountant and fix the terms of such employment. Nothing herein shall be construed to relieve a town or incorporated village of the duty to elect town or village auditors as provided by law.

§§ 1692-1695.
Repealed.
1967, No. 91, § 4.

§ 1696.
Repealed.
1969, No. 219 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 1697.
Repealed.
1967, No. 91, § 4.